Louisiana, session 2026, HB989.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:532.1(A)(7)(c) and (C) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§532.1. Public license tag agents; auto title companies; rules and regulations; surety
bonds; fees
A.
* * *
(7)
* * *
(c) Public license tag agents shall also be authorized to provide information
on the status of registration privileges and to process reinstatements of driving and
motor vehicle registration privileges when these privileges were revoked due to the
failure to maintain the compulsory motor vehicle liability security or the failure to
provide proof of such security. Public license tag agents shall be authorized to
collect a convenience charge not to exceed twenty-three twenty-seven dollars, to
provide information on the status of registration privileges and a charge not to
exceed twenty-three twenty-seven dollars per reinstatement, provided that the
charges are disclosed immediately to the consumer prior to the initiation of the
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 989 ENROLLED
transaction and are posted in a conspicuous manner in the business office of the
public license tag agent.
* * *
C. Public license tag agents shall be authorized to collect a convenience
charge in addition to the registration license tax or other authorized fees, sales taxes,
and transactions. The convenience charge shall not exceed twenty-three twenty-
seven dollars per authorized transaction. However, the public license tag agents shall
collect and retain the full amount of the convenience charge. The seller is authorized
to collect the convenience charge authorized by this Subsection in connection with
any retail sale, in addition to the fees authorized in Chapter 10-B of Title 6 of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.